test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-sunsungkwe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# Proofreadf, is correct.
# 20230504

  Verb - сунсуӈкве: # 'eng see/fin nähdä' - full paradigm
#

#! нс+CV > сCV хансуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: хассум 
#! ньщ+CV > щCV о̄ньщуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: ӧщсум
#! ӈх+CV > хCV таӈхуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: тахсум


    сунсуӈкве+V+Inf: сунсуӈкве
#Active, present tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: сунсэ̄гум
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: сунсэ̄гын
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: сунсы
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: сунсыме̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [сунсэ̄гын, сунсэгы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: сунсэ̄г
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: сунсэ̄в
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [сунсэ̄гын, сунсэгы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: сунсэ̄гыт

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, single object
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg3: сунсылум
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcSg3: сунсылын
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3: сунсытэ
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcSg3: сунсылуме̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcSg3: [сунсылын, сунсылы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcSg3: сунсытэ̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcSg3: [сунсылув, сунсылӯв]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcSg3: [сунсылын, сунсылы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcSg3: сунсыяныл

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, dual object
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcDu3: сунсыягум
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcDu3: сунсыягын
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcDu3: сунсыяге
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcDu3: сунсыягме̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcDu3: [сунсыягын, сунсыягы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcDu3: сунсыяге̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcDu3: [сунсыягув, сунсыягӯв]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcDu3: [сунсыягын, сунсыягы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcDu3: сунсыяганыл

#Active, present tense, indicative, objective conjugation, plural object
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcPl3: сунсыянум
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg2+OcPl3: [сунсыянын, сунсыян]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl3: сунсыянэ
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu1+OcPl3: сунсыянаме̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu2+OcPl3: [сунсыянын, сунсыяны̄н, сунсыян]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScDu3+OcPl3: сунсыянэ̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl1+OcPl3: [сунсыянув, сунсыянӯв]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl2+OcPl3: [сунсыянын, сунсыяны̄н, сунсыян]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ScPl3+OcPl3: сунсыяныл

#Active, past tense, indicative, subjective conjugation
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: суссум
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: суссын
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: сунсыс
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: суссуме̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [суссын, суссы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: [суссыг, суссы̄г]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: [суссув, суссӯв]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [суссын, суссы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: суссыт

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, single object
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg3: сунсыслум
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcSg3: сунсыслын
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcSg3: сунсыстэ
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcSg3: сунсысламе̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcSg3: [сунсыслын, сунсыслы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcSg3: сунсыстэ̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcSg3: [сунсыслув, сунсыслӯв]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcSg3: [сунсыслын, сунсыслы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcSg3: суссаныл

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, dual object
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcDu3: суссагум
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcDu3: суссагын
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcDu3: суссаге
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcDu3: суссагме̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcDu3: [суссагын, суссагы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcDu3: суссаге̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcDu3: [суссагув, суссагӯв]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcDu3: [суссагын, суссагы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcDu3: суссаганыл

#Active, past tense, indicative, objective conjugation, plural object
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcPl3: суссанум
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg2+OcPl3: [суссанын, суссан]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg3+OcPl3: суссанэ
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu1+OcPl3: [суссанаме̄н, суссанаме̄н, суссанме̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu2+OcPl3: [суссанын, суссаны̄н, суссан]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScDu3+OcPl3: суссанэ̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl1+OcPl3: [суссанув, суссанӯв]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl2+OcPl3: [суссанын, суссаны̄н, суссан]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScPl3+OcPl3: сунссаныл

#Active, conditional, subjective conjugation
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1: [суснувум, суснӯвум]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2: [суснувын, суснӯвын]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3: суснув
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1: суснуваме̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2: [суснувын, суснувы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3: [суснувыг, суснувы̄г]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1: [суснувув, суснувӯв]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2: [суснувын, суснувы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3: [суснувыт, суснӯвыт]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, single object
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcSg3: [суснувлум, суснӯвлум]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcSg3: [суснувлын, суснӯвлын]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcSg3: [суснувтэ, суснӯвтэ]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcSg3: суснувламе̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcSg3: [суснувлын, суснувлы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcSg3: суснувтэ̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcSg3: суснувлув
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcSg3: [суснувлын, суснувлы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcSg3: [суснуваныл, суснува̄ныл]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, dual object
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcDu3: [суснувагум, суснува̄гум]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcDu3: [суснувагын, суснува̄гын]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcDu3: [суснуваге, суснува̄ге]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcDu3: суснувагме̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcDu3: [суснувагын, суснувагы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcDu3: суснуваге̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcDu3: суснувагув
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcDu3: [суснувагын, суснувагы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcDu3: [суснуваганыл, суснувага̄ныл]

#Active, conditional, objective conjugation, plural object
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg1+OcPl3: [суснуванум, суснува̄нум]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg2+OcPl3: [суснуванын, суснува̄нын]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScSg3+OcPl3: [суснуванэ, суснува̄нэ]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu1+OcPl3: суснуванме̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu2+OcPl3: [суснуванын, суснуваны̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScDu3+OcPl3: суснуванэ̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl1+OcPl3: [суснуванув, суснуванӯв]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl2+OcPl3: [суснуванын, суснуваны̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Cond+ScPl3+OcPl3: [суснуваныл, снснува̄ныл]

#Active, imperative, subjective conjugation
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2: сунсэн
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2: [сунсэн, сунсэ̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2: [сунсэн, сунсэ̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, single object
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcSg3: [сунсэлн, сунсэ̄лн]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcSg3: [сунсэлн, сунсэлы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcSg3: [сунсэлн, сунсэлы̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, dual object
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcDu3: [сунсэгын, сунсэ̄гн]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcDu3: [сунсэгын, сунсэгы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcDu3: [сунсэгын, сунсэгы̄н]

#Active, imperative,  objective conjugation, plural object
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScSg2+OcPl3: [сунсэн, сунсэ̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScDu2+OcPl3: [сунсэн, сунсэ̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Act+Imprt+ScPl2+OcPl3: [сунсэн, сунсэ̄н]

#Passive, present tense, indicative
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg1: сунсавем
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg2: сунсавен
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScSg3: сунсаве
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu1: сунсавеме̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu2: [сунсавен, сунсаве̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScDu3: сунсаве̄г
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl1: сунсаве̄в
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl2: [сунсавен, сунсаве̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prs+ScPl3: сунсавет

#Passive, past tense, indicative
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg1: сусве̄сум
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg2: сусве̄сын
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScSg3: [сусвес, сусве̄с]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu1: сусвесаме̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu2: [сусвесын, сусвесы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScDu3: сусвесы̄г
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl1: сусвесув
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl2: [сусвесын, сусвесы̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Ind+Prt+ScPl3: сусве̄сыт

#Passive, conditional
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg1: [суснувем, сунснӯвем]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg2: [суснувен, сунснӯвен]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScSg3: [суснуве, сунснӯве]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu1: [суснувеме̄н, суснуве̄ме̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu2: [суснувен, сунснуве̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScDu3: [суснувег, сунснуве̄г]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl1: суснуве̄в
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl2: [суснувен, сунснуве̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Cond+ScPl3: [суснувет, сунснӯвет]

#Passive, imperative conjugation
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Sg2: сунсавен
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Du2: [сунсавен, сунсаве̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+Pass+Imprt+Pl2: [сунсавен, сунсаве̄н]

#Present participle
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc: суснэ
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: суснэм
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: суснэн
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: суснэ̄тэ
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: суснэме̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: суснэнэ̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: [суснэг, сунсэ̄г]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: [сунснэв, суснэ̄в]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: [сунснэнэн, сунснэ̄нэ̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: [сунснэт, сунснэ̄т]

#Present participle, single object
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: суснэ̄лум
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: суснэ̄лн
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: суснэ̄тэ
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: суснэламе̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: суснэлы̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: суснэтэ̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: [суснэлув, суснэлӯв]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: суснэлы̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: [суснэ̄нл, суснэ̄ныл]

#Present participle, dual object
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: суснэ̄гум
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: суснэ̄гн
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: суснэ̄гэ
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: суснэгаме̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: суснэгы̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: суснэгэ̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: [суснэгув, суснэгӯв]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: суснэгагы̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: суснэгаганыл

#Present participle, plural object
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg1: суснэ̄нум
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg2: суснэ̄н
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxSg3: суснэ̄нэ
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu1: [суснэнаме̄н, суснэнанме̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu2: [суснэны̄н, суснэныны̄н, суснэнаны̄н] 
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxDu3: [суснэнэ̄н, суснэнанэ̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl1: [суснэнув, суснэнӯв, суснэнанув, суснэнанӯв]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl2: [суснэны̄н, суснэнаны̄н]
    сунсуӈкве+V+PrsPrc+PxPl3: [суснэ̄нл, суснэ̄наныл]
